Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4315
Risk management pool; applicability of insurance laws.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, (1) any risk management pool organized pursuant to the Intergovernmental Risk Management Act shall not be considered an insurance company or insurer under the laws of this state, (2) any agreement forming a risk management pool or providing group self-insurance coverages to its members shall not constitute insurance or the conduct of an insurance business, and (3) no risk management pool organized pursuant to the Intergovernmental Risk Management Act shall be a member of the Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association or the Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association.

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 15;

Laws 2001, LB 664, § 5.

Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association, see section 44-2705.

Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association, see section 44-2404.